Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1476.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "intimidation" in section 62A03 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 62A03. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Intimidation." Conduct constituting a crime under either of the following provisions between persons who are not family or household members:18 Pa.C.S. § 2709(a)(4), (5), (6) or (7) (relating to harassment) where the conduct is committed by a person 18 12345678910111213141516171819 years of age or older [against a person under 18 years of age].18 Pa.C.S. § 2709.1 (relating to stalking) where the conduct is committed by a person 18 years of age or older [against a person under 18 years of age].* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1476PN2267 - 2 - 1234567